Maine, session 132, LD1292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §1961, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2011, c. 476, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §1961, sub-§7-A is enacted to read:
7-A. Excess funds to be allocated to department. On a quarterly basis, the authority
shall transfer to the Highway Fund, to be used by the department, any revenues and reserves
held by the authority exceeding the sum of:
A. The authority's legislatively approved revenue fund operating budget for the
previous calendar year or current calendar year if no future operating budget has been
legislatively approved, including a general contingency of up to 10%;
B. The amount required for the authority's reserve maintenance fund as determined by
the most recent annual maintenance report of the authority's consulting engineer;
C. The amount required for the authority's debt service fund and debt service reserve
fund, as determined by the authority's bond resolution;
D. The amount required to support the debt service on any of the authority's bonds
dedicated to department projects and not accounted for by paragraph C;
E. Any additional amount specifically required to be kept in reserve by the authority's
bond resolution for the general maintenance and preservation of the turnpike; and
F. Any additional amount allocated to a planning or capital project outside of the
authority's general maintenance and preservation duty that has been reviewed and
approved by both the department and Legislature and found by those bodies to be of
greater funding priority than any other department projects and to be consistent with
section 73.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §1974, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 1993, c. 410, Pt. MM, §9,
is further amended to read:
F. Repayment to the Federal Government for grants or loans that were used in
connection with the construction or reconstruction of any portion of the turnpike or of
any interconnecting access roads, but only to the extent that the repayment is required
in order for the authority to maintain or establish tolls on the turnpike; and
Sec. 4. 23 MRSA §1974, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 457, §7, is
amended to read:
G. Payment or repayment to the Federal Government or any agency of the Federal
Government of any charges, taxes or other payments required by law in connection
with the construction, reconstruction or operation of the turnpike or the financing or
refinancing of the turnpike or any part of the turnpike.; and
Sec. 5. 23 MRSA §1974, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Contributions to the Highway Fund, which include, on a quarterly basis, any
revenues and reserves held by the authority identified in section 1961, subsection 7-A.
Sec. 6. 23 MRSA §1977, as amended by PL 2011, c. 302, §16, is further amended
to read:
§1977. Trust funds
Page 1 - 132LR1915(01)

Subject to any agreement with the bondholders, all revenue received from the operation
of the turnpike after deducting expenditures required for the construction, reconstruction,
operation and maintenance of the turnpike and for the payment of the principal and the
interest on the bonds of the authority or otherwise in accordance with the provisions
thereof, and after deducting the amount provided to the department pursuant to section
1961, subsection 7, must be held and invested by the authority department to establish trust
funds for reserve and sinking funds for the retirement of bonded indebtedness.